Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-681
Short-time compensation; charged to
employer's experience account.

Short-time compensation shall be charged to the employer's
experience account in the same manner as unemployment compensation is charged.
Employers liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall have short-time
compensation attributed to service in their employ in the same manner as unemployment
compensation is attributed.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 22.